Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5419
Utilization review agent; certificate required; term.

On or after July 1, 1993, a utilization review agent may not conduct utilization review upon a covered person in this state unless the agent is granted a certificate by the director. Certificates granted under the Utilization Review Act shall be valid for two years from the date of issuance.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5409;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 4.